Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-741
District; review controls.

A district may review any allocation, rotation, or reduction control imposed in a management area and shall adjust allocations, rotations, or reductions to accommodate new or additional uses or otherwise reflect findings of such review, consistent with the ground water management objectives. Such review shall consider new development or additional ground water uses within the area, more accurate data or information that was not available at the time of the allocation, rotation, or reduction order, the availability of supplemental water supplies, any changes in ground water recharge, and such other factors as the district deems appropriate.

Laws 1982, LB 375, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 439, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-673.11;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 33;

Laws 2001, LB 135, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.27;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 81.